Hawaii statutes.
§93-2 Definitions. "Publication"
means informational matter produced for public distribution or access in any
tangible medium, originating or produced with the imprint of, by the authority
of, or at the total or partial expense of any agency of the State or a county
government. "Publication" does not include manuals, calendars,
schedules, correspondence, or forms intended strictly for in-house use of
governmental agencies, scholarly publications of the University of Hawaii
press, and materials developed by the department of education specifically for
instructional use with students.

"State and county agency" includes
every state, city and county and county office, officer, department, board,
commission, and agency, whether in the legislative, executive, or judicial
branch. [L 1965, c 175, pt of §2(b); Supp, §13-21; HRS §93-2; am L 2012, c 63, §3]

Attorney General Opinions

"Publication" includes agency administrative
rules. Att. Gen. Op. 85-15.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next